test/src/morphology/adj-eES_gt-desc.yaml
# sma/test/src/morphology/adj-eES-gt-desc.yaml

Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Adjective - baahke: # ok c 
    baahke+A+Attr: [baahke, baahkes] 
    baahke+A+Sg+Nom: baahkes 
    baahke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [baahkebe, baahkesabpa, baahkesåbpoe]
    baahke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [baahkemes, baahkesammes, baahkesommes]

  Adjective - byögke: # 
    byögke+A+Attr: [byögke, byögkes] 
    byögke+A+Sg+Nom: byögkes 
    byögke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [byögkebe, byögkesabpa, byögkesåbpoe]
    byögke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [byögkemes,byögkesammes, byögkesommes]

  Adjective - dïeve: # 
    dïeve+A+Attr: [dïeve, dïeves] 
    dïeve+A+Sg+Nom: dïeves 
    dïeve+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dïevebe, dïevesabpa, dïevesåbpoe]
    dïeve+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dïevemes, dïevesammes, dïevesommes]
    
  Adjective - fïerske: # 
    fïerske+A+Attr: [fïerske, fïerskes] 
    fïerske+A+Sg+Nom: [fïerskes, fïerskes]
    fïerske+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [fïerskebe, fïerskesabpa, fïerskesåbpoe]
    fïerske+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [fïerskemes, fïerskesammes, fïerskesommes]

  Adjective - galme: # 
    galme+A+Attr: [galme, galmes] 
    galme+A+Sg+Nom: galmes 
    galme+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [galmebe, galmesabpa, galmesåbpoe]
    galme+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [galmemes, galmesammes, galmesommes]

  Adjective - garre: # c 
    garre+A+Attr: [garre, garres] 
    garre+A+Sg+Nom: [garres, garres]
    garre+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [garrebe, garresabpa, garresåbpoe]
    garre+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [garremes, garresammes, garresommes]

  Adjective - gïemhpe: # 
    gïemhpe+A+Attr: [gïemhpe, gïemhpes] 
    gïemhpe+A+Sg+Nom: gïemhpes 
    gïemhpe+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [gïemhpebe, gïemhpesabpa, gïemhpesåbpoe]
    gïemhpe+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [gïemhpemes, gïemhpesammes, gïemhpesommes]

  Adjective - jaame: # 
    jaame+A+Attr: jaame 
    jaame+A+Sg+Nom: jaames 

  Adjective - lovve: # 
    lovve+A+Attr: [lovve, lovves]
    lovve+A+Sg+Nom: [lovves]
    lovve+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [lovvesabpa, lovvesåbpoe, lovvebe]
    lovve+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [lovvesommes, lovvesammes, lovvemes]
    
  Adjective - lïene: # 
    lïene+A+Attr: [lïene, lïenes] 
    lïene+A+Sg+Nom: lïenes 
    lïene+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [lïenebe, lïenesabpa, lïenesåbpoe]
    lïene+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [lïenemes, lïenesommes, lïenesammes]
    
  Adjective - mïevhke: # 
    mïevhke+A+Attr: [mïevhke, mïevhkes]
    mïevhke+A+Sg+Nom: mïevhkes 
    mïevhke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [mïevhkebe, mïevhkesabpa, mïevhkesåbpoe]
    mïevhke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [mïevhkemes, mïevhkesommes, mïevhkesammes]

  Adjective - njoere: # 
    njoere+A+Attr: njoere 
    njoere+A+Sg+Nom: njoeres 
    njoere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: njoerebe 
    njoere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: njoeremes

  Adjective - plaave: # 
    plaave+A+Attr: plaave 
    plaave+A+Sg+Nom: [plaave, plaaves]
    plaave+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [plaavebe, plaevebe, plaavesåbpoe, plaavesabpa]
    plaave+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [plaavemes, plaavesammes, plaavesommes]

  Adjective - plïehtje: # 
    plïehtje+A+Attr: plïehtje 
    plïehtje+A+Sg+Nom: plïehtjes 
    plïehtje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: plïehtjebe 
    plïehtje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: plïehtjemes

  Adjective - praare: # 
    praare+A+Attr: [praare, praares] 
    praare+A+Sg+Nom: [praares, praares]
    praare+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [praarebe, praaresabpa, praaresåbpoe]
    praare+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [praaremes, praaresammes, praaresommes]
    
  Adjective - rïektes: # 
    rïektes+A+Attr: rïekte 
    rïektes+A+Sg+Nom: rïektes 
    rïektes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: rïektebe 
    rïektes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: rïektemes

  Adjective - skïemtje: # 
    skïemtje+A+Attr: [skïemtje, skïemtjes] 
    skïemtje+A+Sg+Nom: skïemtjes 
    skïemtje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [skïemtjebe, skïemtjesabpa, skïemtjesåbpoe]
    skïemtje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [skïemtjemes, skïemtjesammes, skïemtjesommes]

  Adjective - stoere: # c 
    stoere+A+Attr: stoere 
    stoere+A+Sg+Nom: stoere 
    stoere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [stuerebe, stoerebe]
    stoere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [stööremes, stoeremes]

  Adjective - tjïelke: # c 
    tjïelke+A+Attr: [tjïelke, tjïelkes] 
    tjïelke+A+Sg+Nom: tjïelkes 
    tjïelke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [tjïelkebe, tjïelkesabpa, tjïelkesåbpoe]
    tjïelke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [tjïelkemes, tjïelkesommes, tjïelkesammes]
